src/morphology/affixes/adjectives-oahpa.lexc
LEXICON BAERIES  !!= * __@CODE@__
 :båerie ATTR_S   ;
 :båerie PRED_S   ;
 :båaras aCASEOBL ; ! båarasam (LK)
 :båaras ODDCOMP  ;

LEXICON GÆHTJOES  !!= * __@CODE@__
 :gyhtje  PRED_0        ; ! bort? ikke dokumentert, se Majas kommmentar her
 :gyhtjek ODDCOMP       ; !-gyhtjekåbpoe-gyhtjekommes - (substantiv=gyhtje) UMLAUT IN COMP
 :gæhtjoe s_S_ODDNOCOMP ;

LEXICON AAREH !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Use/NG:    ATTR_H   ;
 +Use/NG:    PRED_H   ;
        :e   ATTR_H   ;
        :e   PRED_H   ;
        :e   EVENCOMP ;
 +Use/NG:eg  ODDCOMP  ;
 +Use/NG:ehk ODDCOMP  ;
! aarehkåbpoe, aarehkommes 'hk', 'g' ,'ht' ? (Lohkede saemien s.116)
! "dagkoe gogkoe dle aaregommes" adv?
!     eCASEOBL ; ! check! this is not right
! aarebi - adv, finnes aarebe? aaremes?

LEXICON MOOREH !!= * __@CODE@__
 :e   ATTR_H  ;
 :e   PRED_H  ;
!    eCASEOBL ; ! check! this is not right
 :ehk ODDCOMP ;


LEXICON BURRIE !!= * __@CODE@__
        +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:#buer ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP ; !
 +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/NG:#burr ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP ;


!! !!Regular even stem types


LEXICON EVTEBE   !!= * __@CODE@__
             :ie  EVENSUPONLY  ;
             :ie  EVENCOMPCASE ;
 +A+Comp+Attr:ebe FINAL1       ;

LEXICON ATTR_EVEN   !!= * __@CODE@__
 :ies ATTR_0   ;
 :e   EVENCOMP ;

LEXICON ATTR_ODD   !!= * __@CODE@__
   ATTR_0  ;
   ODDCOMP ;


LEXICON ø_Ø_EVEN  !!= * __@CODE@__
   ATTR_0 ;
   PRED_0 ;
! no case and comparation ?

LEXICON IJVEadj !!= * __@CODE@__
  +Use/NG:ijv e_E_EVEN ;
         :ïjv e_E_EVEN ;
 +Err/Orth:iv  e_E_EVEN ;


LEXICON LES  !!= * __@CODE@__ Should contain only loanwords (?)
          :es                 ATTR_0   ; ! should redirect to case paradigm
 +A+Sg+Nom:%>%^DISIMPes       FINAL1   ;
 +A+Sg+Acc:asse%>m            FINAL1   ;
 +A+Sg+Gen:asse%>n            FINAL1   ;
 +A+Sg+Ill:asse%>se           FINAL1   ;
 +A+Sg+Ine:asse%>sne          FINAL1   ;
 +A+Sg+Ela:asse%>ste          FINAL1   ;
 +A+Sg+Com:ass%>ine           FINAL1   ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMP%>ass%>h FINAL1   ;
 +A+Pl+Acc:%>ass%>ide         FINAL1   ;
 +A+Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMP%>ass%>  IGENSUFF ;
 +A+Pl+Ill:%>ass%>ide         FINAL1   ;
 +A+Pl+Ine:%>ass%>ine         FINAL1   ;
 +A+Pl+Ela:%>ass%>ijste       FINAL1   ;
 +A+Pl+Com:%>ass%>igujmie     FINAL1   ;
        +A:ass                EVEN_ESS ;
!+A+SgNomCmp:%>%^DISIMPes    R ; ! trond
!+A+SgGenCmp:asse%>n R ;		 ! trond
!+A+PlGenCmp:ass%>i  R ;		 ! trond


LEXICON IJAALE_A_LOAN !!= * __@CODE@__
    +Err/Orth:aal  AALEFORMS ;
    +Err/Orth:al   AALEFORMS ;
    +Err/Orth:jal  AALEFORMS ;
            :jaal AALEFORMS ;
 +A+SgNomCmp:al   R         ;


LEXICON AATE_adj_LOAN  !!= * __@CODE@__
         :ate ATTR_0 ;
 +Err/Orth:te  ATTR_0 ; !
 +Err/Orth:hte ATTR_0 ; !


LEXICON AALE !!= * __@CODE@__
            :al AALEFORMS ; ! vitaale = norm
    +Err/Orth:l  AALEFORMS ; ! vitale = descriptive
 +N+SgNomCmp:l  R         ;

LEXICON AALEFORMS !!= * __@CODE@__
! merging spinaale e_E_EVEN  and spinaales es_ES_EVEN
! they were set up as doublets in the lexicon and had
! identical comparatives and superlatives.
! The new solution analyses the same wordforms as before,
! but operates with a single lemma spinaale etc.
! Todo: look into eCASE / ODDCASE -variation (double case paradigm?)
        :e ATTR_0   ; ! vitaale
 +Use/NG:e ATTR_S   ;
           eCASE    ;
        :e PRED_S   ;
        :e EVENCOMP ;

LEXICON oe_OE_EVEN  !!= * __@CODE@__
 :oe ATTR_0   ;
     oeCASE   ;
 :e  EVENCOMP ; ! This one is ok!


LEXICON e_E_EVEN  !!= * __@CODE@__
 :e ATTR_0   ;
    eCASE    ;
 :e EVENCOMP ; ! This one is ok!

LEXICON e_E_EVENNOCOMP  !!= ** __@CODE@__
 :e ATTR_0 ;
    eCASE  ;

LEXICON a_A_EVENNOCOMP  !!= ** __@CODE@__
 :a ATTR_0 ;
    aCASE  ;

LEXICON a_A_EVEN !!= * __@CODE@__
 :a ATTR_0   ;
    aCASE    ;
 :a EVENCOMP ;


LEXICON ie_IE_EVEN  !!= * __@CODE@__
 :ie ATTR_0   ;
     ieCASE   ;
 :ie EVENCOMP ; ! This one is ok!

LEXICON ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP  !!= ** __@CODE@__
 :ie ATTR_0 ;
     ieCASE ;

LEXICON es_ES_EVEN  !!= * __@CODE@__
 :e  ATTR_S     ;
 :e  PRED_S     ; ! veelkes
 :es ODDCASEOBL ; ! veelkesem
 :e  EVENCOMP   ; ! check this! stamme

LEXICON es_ES_EVENNOCOMP  !!= ** __@CODE@__
 :e  ATTR_S     ;
 :e  PRED_S     ; ! veelkes
 :es ODDCASEOBL ; ! veelkesem

LEXICON ies_IES_EVEN  !!= * __@CODE@__
     ies_IES_EVENNOCOMP ;
 :ie EVENCOMP           ; !

LEXICON ies_IES_EVENNOCOMP  !!= ** __@CODE@__
 :ie ATTR_S    ;
 :ie PRED_S    ;
     ieCASEOBL ;


LEXICON Cs_CS_EVEN  !!= * __@CODE@__
    ATTR_S   ;
    PRED_S   ;
    eCASEOBL ; ! pred form with s
 :e EVENCOMP ; ! check this! -igs is the same as ihks - ebe/emes


LEXICON ihks_IHKS_EVENNOCOMP !!= * __@CODE@__
   ATTR_S   ;
   PRED_S   ;
   eCASEOBL ; ! Passer denne?


LEXICON RAARH   !!= * __@CODE@__ Attr= h, Comp =Even( Jïjtje-raarh)
      ATTR_H         ;
      PRED_H         ;
 :ehk HKE_ODD_NGCOMP ;



LEXICON MAST !!= * __@CODE@__
           ATTR_S ;
 +Use/NG:e ATTR_S ;
 +Use/NG:  ATTR_H ;
 +Use/NG:e ATTR_N ;
        :e PRED_N ;
! comp?
! case?

!! !type 2

LEXICON JELLE !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Err/Orth:^ell e_ES_LOAN ;
         :jell e_ES_LOAN ;

LEXICON UELLE !!= * __@CODE@__
         :^ell e_ES_LOAN ; ! begge norm?
 +Err/Orth:vell e_ES_LOAN ;


LEXICON e_ES_LOAN   !!= * __@CODE@__ LOAN  - fjerna comp LA - vi kan vurdere om noen av disse bør ha komp.
            e_ES_EVENNOCOMP ;
 +Err/Orth:e PRED_0          ; ! forslag


LEXICON ÆRE   !!= * __@CODE@__ LOAN
         :ær e_ES_EVEN ;
 +Err/Orth:r  e_ES_EVEN ;

LEXICON ENTE   !!= * __@CODE@__ LOAN
         :ent  e_E_EVENNOCOMP ; ! eller skal det være -e-es ?
 +Err/Orth:eent e_E_EVENNOCOMP ;


!LEXICON ANSKE
!:ansk e_ES_EVEN  ;
!+Err/Orth:aansk e_ES_EVEN  ;


LEXICON LES_LASSE_ie  !!= * __@CODE@__ derivasjon av verb
   LES_LASSE_NOM_ie ;
   LES_LASSE_OBL_ie ;

LEXICON LES_LASSE_NOM_ie  !!= * __@CODE@__
            :eles     ATTR_0   ; ! should redirect to case paradigm
   +A+Sg+Nom:eles     FINAL1   ;
   +A+Pl+Nom:elass%>h FINAL1   ;
   +A+Pl+Gen:elass%>  IGENSUFF ;
 +A+SgNomCmp:eles     R        ;


LEXICON LES_LASSE_OBL_ie  !!= * __@CODE@__
   +A+Sg+Nom:alasse           FINAL1   ;
   +A+Sg+Acc:alasse%>m        FINAL1   ;
   +A+Sg+Gen:alasse%>n        FINAL1   ;
   +A+Sg+Ill:alasse%>se       FINAL1   ;
   +A+Sg+Ine:alasse%>sne      FINAL1   ;
   +A+Sg+Ela:alasse%>ste      FINAL1   ;
   +A+Sg+Com:alass%>ine       FINAL1   ;
   +A+Pl+Acc:al%>ass%>ide     FINAL1   ;
   +A+Pl+Ill:al%>ass%>ide     FINAL1   ;
   +A+Pl+Ine:al%>ass%>ine     FINAL1   ;
   +A+Pl+Ela:al%>ass%>ijste   FINAL1   ;
   +A+Pl+Com:al%>ass%>igujmie FINAL1   ;
          +A:alass            EVEN_ESS ;
 +A+SgGenCmp:alasse%>n        R        ;
 +A+PlGenCmp:alass%>i         R        ;


LEXICON e_ES_EVEN  !!= * __@CODE@__
 :e ATTR_0   ;
 :e PRED_S   ;
    eCASEOBL ;
 :e EVENCOMP ;

LEXICON e_ES_EVENNOCOMP  !!= ** __@CODE@__
 :e ATTR_0   ;
 :e PRED_S   ;
    eCASEOBL ;

LEXICON e_ES_ODDEVEN  !!= * __@CODE@__
            :e  ATTR_0     ;
                eCASEOBL   ; ! galmem
            :es ODDCASEOBL ; ! galmesem ??? XXX Check!
   +A+Sg+Nom:es FINAL1     ;
 +A+SgNomCmp:es R          ;
     +Use/NG:e  EVENCOMP   ;
            :es ODDCOMP    ; ! Both even and odd?


! type 3 Theese three should be ok!
LEXICON es_E_EVEN   !!= * __@CODE@__
 :e ATTR_S   ;
    eCASE    ;
 :e EVENCOMP ;

LEXICON en_E_EVEN   !!= * __@CODE@__
 :e ATTR_N   ;
    eCASE    ;
 :e EVENCOMP ;


LEXICON as_A_EVEN   !!= * __@CODE@__ attr= s, pred= e, comp=EVEN(ebe,emes), Case/Substantvien hammoe= EVEN
 :a ATTR_S   ;
    aCASE    ;
 :a EVENCOMP ;

LEXICON oes_OE_EVEN   !!= * __@CODE@__ attr= s, pred= Ø, Comp= EVEN(ebe, emes) case/substantiven hammoe= Even
     oes_OE_EVENNOCOMP ;
 :oe EVENCOMP_oe       ;

LEXICON oes_OE_EVENNOCOMP  !!= ** __@CODE@__
 :oe ATTR_S ;
     oeCASE ;

!OK
LEXICON ies_IE_EVEN   !!= * __@CODE@__ attr= s, pred. = Ø, comp jih case: even (ebe/emes/esne)
 :ie ATTR_S   ;
     ieCASE   ;
 :ie EVENCOMP ;
